Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3310 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In the event a public trust hospital enters into a joint venture
with or acquires an interest in a not-for-profit entity to
effectuate the administration of the mission of the public trust,
that entity shall not be subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act
and the Oklahoma Open Records Act. Any information submitted to or
compiled by the public trust with respect to marketing plans,
financial statements, trade secrets, research concepts, methods or
products or any other proprietary information submitted to or
compiled by the trust, persons, firms, associations, partnerships,
agencies, corporations, institutions of higher education, nonprofit
research institutions, or other entities shall be confidential,
except to the extent that the person or entity which provided such
information or which is the subject of such information consents to
disclosure. Executive sessions may be held to discuss such
materials if deemed necessary by the trust. The provisions of this

section shall not apply to budgetary information related to
appropriations or the appropriations process. For purposes of this
section, "public trust hospital" is defined as any hospital created
pursuant to Section 176.1 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes or
Section 790.1 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1738 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 13th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1738 Page 3